Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.046

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

[ 1987 c 150 s 58; 1986 c 259 s 139.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.